Hawaii statutes.
[§454F-47] Disciplinary action against
licensee. No provision of this chapter relating to the mortgage loan
recovery fund shall limit the authority of the commissioner to take
disciplinary action against any licensee for a violation of this chapter or of
the rules and orders of the commissioner adopted pursuant to this chapter.
Repayment of obligations to the mortgage loan recovery fund by a licensee shall
not nullify or modify the effect of any other disciplinary proceeding brought
pursuant to this chapter. [L 2010, c 84, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next